finished/xty.foma
source canonicalize.foma



# naʔ¹ma¹	naʔ¹ma¹	V;PFV;LGSPEC2
# chi³ndaʔ³a⁴	chi³ndaʔ³a⁴	V;IRR (okay)

# ka³si²	nda⁴si²	V;STAT
# ndo³ko³	ndo⁴ko³	V;IPFV

# ku³-ndi³chi²	ku¹⁴-ndi³chi²	V;IRR;NEG
# nda³-tu¹u³	ni¹-nda³-tu¹u³	V;PFV;LGSPEC1



def Alphabet [% |%(|%)|%,|%-|%/|%=|a|b|c|d|e|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|s|t|u|w|x|y|²|³|¹|ñ|ʔ|⁴]; 
def Stem Alphabet+;


read lexc xty.lexc
def Lexicon ;



# need to figure this out 
# def Change ³ -> ⁴ || Alphabet* _ .#.; 
# def Change ³ -> ⁴ || .#. Alphabet* _ ; 
# def Change {¹} -> {¹⁴} || .#. Alphabet* _ ; 

# def Change {³} -> {¹⁴} || .#. ~$³ _ ;


def Grammar [	["[V]" "[PFV]" "[LGSPEC1]"]:{LG1ni¹-} Stem | 
				["[V]" "[PFV]" "[LGSPEC2]"]:{LG2} Stem | 
				["[V]" "[IRR]"]:0 Stem | 
				["[V]" "[IPFV]"]:{IP} Stem | 
				["[V]" "[IRR]" "[NEG]"]:{NG} Stem | 
				["[V]" "[STAT]"]:0 Stem 
				]; 


# NEG    -----------------------------------------------------------
def First1To14 {¹} -> {¹⁴} || N G ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def First3To14 {³} -> {¹⁴} || N G ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def First4To14 {⁴} -> {¹⁴} || N G ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
# def Last4To14 {⁴} -> {¹⁴}  || N G ?*  _ .#.;

def adjust {¹⁴⁴} -> {¹⁴} || [N G ?*] _ ;

def Neg [First1To14 .o. First3To14 .o. First4To14 .o. adjust]; 

# LGSPEC2 -----------------------------------------------------------
def First3To13LG2 {³} -> {¹³} || L G 2 ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def First4To14LG2 {⁴} -> {¹⁴} || L G 2 ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def Ku13ToSa13 {ku¹³n} -> {ju¹³n} || L G 2 _ ; 
def try {kwa¹} -> {xa¹} || L G 2 _ .o. {kwi¹s} -> {si¹s} || L G 2 _; 
def kwi {kwi} -> {xi} || L G 2 _ ;
def LG2 [First3To13LG2 .o. First4To14LG2 .o. Ku13ToSa13 .o. kwi .o. try]; 


# LGSPEC1 -----------------------------------------------------------
def Lg1 [{ni¹-kwi¹} -> {ni¹-xi¹} || L G 1]; 
def Lg1Ku [{ni¹-ku³n} -> {ni¹-ju³n} || L G 1]; 
def Lg1kwi [{ni¹-kwiʔ} -> {ni¹-xiʔ} || L G 1]; 
def Lg1kwa [{ni¹-kwa} -> {ni¹-xa} || L G 1]; 
def First4To14LG1 {⁴} -> {¹⁴} || L G 1 ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;

def LG1Rule Lg1 .o. Lg1Ku .o. Lg1kwi .o. Lg1kwa .o. First4To14LG1 ; 


# IPFV    -----------------------------------------------------------
def First3To4IP {³} -> {⁴} || I P ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def First1To4IP {¹} -> {⁴} || I P ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ;
def adjust {xa⁴⁴} -> {i⁴xa¹⁴} .o. {xi⁴⁴} -> {i⁴xi¹⁴} .o. {xiʔ⁴⁴} -> {yuʔ⁴⁴};  
def ipfv First3To4IP .o. First1To4IP .o. adjust; 


def CleanUp {LG2} -> 0 .o. {LG1} -> 0 .o. {IP} -> 0 .o. {NG} -> 0;  

def TakeFirstSrash ?+ @-> 0 || "/" _ .#. .o. "/" -> 0 .o. " " -> 0; 
def TakeFirstComma ?+ @-> 0 || "," _ .#. .o. "," -> 0 .o. " " -> 0; 

# regex Canonicalize(Grammar) .o. ipfv .o. Neg .o. LG2 .o. Lg1 .o. CleanUp .o. TakeFirstSrash .o. TakeFirstComma;




def A4 {a⁴A4} -> {a¹⁴}; 
def IP13 {³A13IP} -> {¹³}; 

def LexcCleanUp {¹} -> {¹⁴} || ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ?* [N G];
def LexcCleanUp2 {¹} -> {⁴} || ~$[³ | ¹ | ⁴] _ ?* [I P];



def Output [Lexicon .o. LexcCleanUp .o. LexcCleanUp2 .o. A4 .o. IP13] .P. [Canonicalize(Grammar) .o. ipfv .o. Neg .o. LG2 .o. LG1Rule .o. TakeFirstSrash .o. TakeFirstComma] .o. CleanUp;
regex Output; 




save stack xty.fomabin
watt > xty.att 


# sa³na³[V][IRR][NEG]
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[IPFV\]' | wc -l,  
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[IRR\]\[NEG\]' | wc -l
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[PFV\]\[LGSPEC2\]' | wc -l,  
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[PFV\]\[LGSPEC1\]' | wc -l, 101 
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[STAT\]' | wc -l, 22
# python evalfstatt.py -t xty  | grep '\[V\]\[IRR\] ' | wc -l,  


# 							 		| not pass / num instances 
# grep '\[V\]\[PFV\]\[LGSPEC1\]'    | 81  / 414 			/ 131
# grep '\[V\]\[PFV\]\[LGSPEC2\]'    | 85  / 424  			/ 110
# grep '\[V\]\[IRR\]\[NEG\]' 		| 68  / 415 			/ 119 
# grep '\[V\]\[IRR\] '      		| 4   / 474				/ 242 
# grep '\[V\]\[IPFV\]' 				| 139 / 431 			/ 113 

# trianing ACCURACY: xty 0.8109004739336493
# dev 	   ACCURACY: xty 0.7993311036789298

# kiʔ¹bi³[V][IPFV]
# ndi¹i⁴[V][IRR][NEG]
